src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals

LEXICON NM
!{COUNTING START
aabta:aabita                            NUM_TAG    " 1 half" ; !Rand key:n7297243342n
bezhig:bezhig                           NUM_TAG    " 1 one;  2 a certain individual... (often used when making first reference to individuals in narration)" ; !Rand key:n7297662289n
niish:niizh                             NUM_TAG    " 1 two" ; !Rand key:n71431844474n
nswi:niswi                              NUM_TAG    " 1 three" ; !Rand key:n71435059259n
niiwin:niiwin                           NUM_TAG    " 1 four" ; !Rand key:n71431843754n
naanan:naanan                           NUM_TAG    " 1 five" ; !Rand key:n71431057896n
naanin:naanin                           NUM_TAG    " 1 five" ; !Rand key:n71431060501n
ngodwaaswi:ningodwaaswi                 NUM_TAG    " 1 six" ; !Rand key:n71431656374n
niizhwaaswi:niizhwaaswi                 NUM_TAG    " 1 seven" ; !Rand key:n71431850131n
nshwaaswi:nishwaaswi                    NUM_TAG    " 1 eight" ; !Rand key:n71434553714n
zhaangswi:zhaangaswi                    NUM_TAG    " 1 nine" ; !Rand key:n73033448914n
mdaaswi:midaaswi                        NUM_TAG    " 1 ten" ; !Rand key:n71429470431n
niishtana:niizhidana                    NUM_TAG    " 1 twenty" ; !Rand key:n71431844497n !i sourced from creedictionary.com, where nistana and nisitana are listed. Baraga, OPD do not list a vowel, Rhodes lists niizhdana
nsimdana:nisimidana                     NUM_TAG    " 1 thirty" ; !Rand key:n71434557020n
niimdana:niimidana                      NUM_TAG    " 1 forty" ; !Rand key:n71431757054n
naanmidna:naanimidana                   NUM_TAG    " 1 fifty" ; !Rand key:n71431060924n
ngodwaasmidna:ningodwaasVv1midana       NUM_TAG    " 1 sixty" ; !Rand key:n71431654926n
niizhwaasmidna:niizhwaasVv1midana       NUM_TAG    " 1 seventy" ; !Rand key:n71431849639n
nshwaasmidna:nishwaasVv1midana          NUM_TAG    " 1 eighty" ; !Rand key:n71434553008n
zhaangsimdana:zhaangasimidana           NUM_TAG    " 1 ninety" ; !Rand key:n73033448206n
ngodwaak:ningodwaak                     NUM_TAG    " 1 one hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431654764n
niizhwaak:niizhwaak                     NUM_TAG    " 1 two hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431849517n
nswaak:niswaak                          NUM_TAG    " 1 three hundred" ; !Rand key:n71435058978n
niiwaak:niiwaak                         NUM_TAG    " 1 four hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431842786n
naanwaak:naanwaak                       NUM_TAG    " 1 five hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431062767n
ngodwaaswaak:ningodwaaswaak             NUM_TAG    " 1 six hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431656264n
niizhwaaswaak:niizhwaaswaak             NUM_TAG    " 1 seven hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431850068n
nshwaaswaak:nishwaaswaak                NUM_TAG    " 1 eight hundred" ; !Rand key:n71434553640n
zhaangswaak:zhaangaswaak                NUM_TAG    " 1 nine hundred" ; !Rand key:n73033448817n
mdaaswaak:midaaswaak                    NUM_TAG    " 1 one thousand, ten hundred, thousand" ; !Rand key:n71429470161n
!COUNTING END}
!{MEASURE START
ngo-bkwaakninch:ningo-bikwaakVv1ninj    NUM_TAG    " 1 one fistful, one handful" ; !Rand key:n73098742879n
ngo-dba'gaans:ningo-dibahigaans         NUM_TAG    " 1 one inch;  2 one hour;  3 one minute" ; !Rand key:n71431647234n
nsoozit:nisoozid                        NUM_TAG    " 1 three feet [long or high]" ; !Rand key:n71434671576n
ngo-dba'aabaan:ningo-dibahaabaan        NUM_TAG    " 1 one mile" ; !Rand key:n20106517-36-31n
!niizho-dbagiiswaan:niizho-dibahigiiziswaan NUM_TAG   " 1 two hours" ; !Rand key:n20114822-0-50n !this needs to be listed, not derived, because I don't see any other dbagiiswaan words combining with numerals. dbagiiswaan is a word, we seem to have much better attestation of -o with preverbs/nouns than -oo
!MEASURE END}
!{DISTRIBUTIVE START
bebezhig:bebezhig                       NUM_TAG    " 1 one by one;  2 one each (comm);  3 only a few, a few, some few (SI)" ; !Rand key:n201132915-11-37n
neniizh:neniizh                         NUM_TAG    " 1 two by two;  2 two each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-23-28n
nenswi:neniswi                          NUM_TAG    " 1 three by three;  2 three each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-25-28n
neniiwin:neniiwin                       NUM_TAG    " 1 four by four;  2 four each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-36-6n
nenaanan:nenaanan                       NUM_TAG    " 1 five by five;  2 five each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-37-58n
nen'godwaaswi:neningodwaaswi            NUM_TAG    " 1 six by six;  2 six each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-39-31n ![gk]Vo1 replaced with [gk]o
!DISTRIBUTIVE END}
!{REPETITION START
mnik-dshing:minik-dashing               NUM_TAG    " 1 number of times" ; !Rand key:n71430158675n
niizhing:niizhing                       NUM_TAG    " 1 twice, two times" ; !Rand key:n71431845065n
nsing:nising                            NUM_TAG    " 1 three times" ; !Rand key:n71434557145n
niiwing:niiwing                         NUM_TAG    " 1 four times" ; !Rand key:n71431843781n
naaning:naaning                         NUM_TAG    " 1 five times" ; !Rand key:n71431060530n
zhaangching:zhaangaching                NUM_TAG    " 1 nine times" ; !Rand key:n73072583118n
mdaaching:midaaching                    NUM_TAG    " 1 ten times" ; !Rand key:n71429457847n
mdaasing:midaasing                      NUM_TAG    " 1 ten times" ; !Rand key:n71429469698n
!REPETITION END}
!{ORDINAL START
e-ntam:e-nitam                          NUM_TAG    " 1 the very first, the very first time" ; !Rand key:n73101858420n DAB: This is mentioned in the grammar
shki-ntam:oshki-nitam                   NUM_TAG    " 1 the very first, the very first time" ; !Rand key:n73101858420n DAB: This is mentioned in the grammar
aapji-ntam:aapiji-nitam                 NUM_TAG    " 1 the very first, the very first time" ; !Rand key:n73101858420n DAB: This once was an adverb in the model
eko-niizhing:eko-niizhing               NUM_TAG    " 1 the second time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-1-23n
eko-nsing:eko-nising                    NUM_TAG    " 1 the third time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-2-54n
eko-niiwing:eko-niiwing                 NUM_TAG    " 1 the fourth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-6-33n
eko-naaning:eko-naaning                 NUM_TAG    " 1 the fifth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-43-9n
eko-n'godwaaching:eko-ningodwaaching    NUM_TAG    " 1 the sixth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-44-30n
eko-niizhwaaching:eko-niizhwaaching     NUM_TAG    " 1 the seventh time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-47-35n
eko-nswaaching:eko-niswaaching          NUM_TAG    " 1 the eighth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-48-35n
eko-zhaangching:eko-zhaangaching        NUM_TAG    " 1 the ninth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-49-28n
eko-mdaaching:eko-midaaching            NUM_TAG    " 1 the tenth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-50-53n
!ORDINAL END}
!niizhing mdaaswaak:niizhing midaaswaak    NUM_TAG    " 1 two thousand" ; !Rand key:n20101189-53-13n
!nsing mdaaswaak:nising midaaswaak    NUM_TAG    " 1 three thousand" ; !Rand key:n20101189-54-46n
!niiwing mdaaswaak:niiwing midaaswaak    NUM_TAG    " 1 four thousand" ; !Rand key:n20101189-56-37n
!mdaaswi shi bezhik:midaaswi ashi bezhig    NUM_TAG    " 1 eleven" ; !Rand key:n20114819-57-33n
!mdaaswi shi niish:midaaswi ashi niizh    NUM_TAG    " 1 twelve" ; !Rand key:n20114819-58-34n
!mdaaswi shi nswi:midaaswi ashi niswi    NUM_TAG    " 1 thirteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-0-24n
!mdaaswi shi niiwin:midaaswi ashi niiwin    NUM_TAG    " 1 fourteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-1-40n
!mdaaswi shi naanan:midaaswi ashi naanan    NUM_TAG    " 1 fifteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-2-51n
!mdaaswi shi ngodwaaswi:midaaswi ashi ningodwaaswi    NUM_TAG    " 1 sixteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-4-36n
!mdaaswi shi niizhwaaswi:midaaswi ashi niizhwaaswi    NUM_TAG    " 1 seventeen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-5-32n
!mdaaswi shi nshwaaswi:midaaswi ashi nishwaaswi    NUM_TAG    " 1 eighteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-11-51n
!mdaaswi shi zhaangswi:midaaswi ashi zhaangaswi    NUM_TAG    " 1 nineteen" ; !Rand key:n20114820-12-56n
!niishtana shi bezhik:niishtana ashi bezhig    NUM_TAG    " 1 twenty-one" ; !Rand key:n20114820-16-37n
!mdaaswi shi bezhik nching:midaaswi ashi bezhig naching    NUM_TAG    " 1 eleven times" ; !Rand key:n20114820-20-44n
!mdaaswaak shi nshwaaswaak miinwaa mdaaswi shi niish:midaaswaak ashi nishwaaswaak miinwaa midaaswi ashi niizh    NUM_TAG    " 1 1812 (the year)" ; !Rand key:n20114823-18-47n 

LEXICON NUM_TAG
+Num:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 
